dev/verbs/Clean_FILE.lexc
LEXICON CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS

%<condcnt%>:%>%{I%}yors%{A%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL

%<evidc%>:%>m%{I%}şs%{A%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS 

%<evidcnt%>:%>m%{I%}ş PERS1-NO3PL ;
%<evidcnt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>m%{I%}ş%>d%{I%}%>l%{A%}r # ; ! Dir/LR
%<evidcnt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>m%{I%}ş%>l%{A%}r%>%d%{I%} # ; 

LEXICON EVIDENTIAL-PAST

%<evid%>:%>m%{I%}ş PERS1 ;
%<evid%>:%>m%{I%}ş KEN ;

LEXICON EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT

%<evidp%>:%>m%{I%}şt%{I%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON EXHORTATIVE

%<exh%>:%> PERS6 ;

LEXICON FINITE-VERBS-AR

!!! FINITE-VERBS-AR IS USED FOR CONTINUATION AFTER CERTAIN STEMS

AOR-AR ;
AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
IMPERATIVE ;
CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
FUTURE ;
FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
FUTURE-PERFECT ;
IMPERFECTIVE ;
PAST ;
PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
CONDITIONAL;

LEXICON FINITE-VERBS-IR

AOR-IR ;
AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
AORIST-IR-PERFECT ;
CONDITIONAL;
CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
FUTURE ;
FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
FUTURE-PERFECT ;
IMPERATIVE ;
IMPERFECTIVE ;
PAST ;
PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;

LEXICON FUTURE

%<fut%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}k PERS1 ;

LEXICON FUTURE-CONDITIONAL

%<futc%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}ks%{A%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL

%<fute%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}km%{I%}ş PERS1 ;

LEXICON FUTURE-PERFECT

%<futp%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}kt%{I%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<futp%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c{A%}k%>l%{A%}r%>d%{I%}  # ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON GERUND

%<ger1%>:%>m%{A%} SUBST ;
%<ger2%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}k SUBST ;
%<ger3%>:%>%{I%}ş SUBST ;
%<ger4%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}k SUBST ;
%<ger5%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}n SUBST ;
%<ger6%>:%>m%{A%}k SUBST ;

LEXICON IMPERATIVE

%<imp%>:%> PERS4 ;

LEXICON IMPERFECTIVE

%<imper%>:%>m%{A%}kt%{A%} PERS3 ;

LEXICON IV-CAUS-DIR-IR
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NEG ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r ABIL-IR ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NECE ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NON-FINITE ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r PASS-DIR-IR ;
NEG ;
FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
ABIL-IR ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;

LEXICON IV-REC-DIR-AR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON IV-REF-DIR-AR

%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON JUSSIVE

%<juss%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;
%<juss%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}nl%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON NECE

%<nece%>:%>m%{A%}l%{I%} PERS3 ;             ! prc, + copula
%<necepast%>:%>m%{A%}l%{I%} PERS3-PAST ;


LEXICON NEG

%<neg%>:%>m%{a%} REGULAR-NEGATIVE ;

LEXICON NON-FINITE

%<inf%>:%>m%{A%}k # ;
%<prc1%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}n ATTR ;
%<gna1%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}r%{A%}k # ;
%<gna2%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}p # ;

LEXICON PAST

%<past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON PAST-CONDITIONAL

%<pastc%>:%>d%{I%}ys%{A%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON PAST-CONTINUOUS

%<pastcnt%>:%>%{I%}yord%{I%} PERS1-NO3PL ;
%<pastcnt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}yord%{I%}%>l%{A%}r # ; ! Dir/LR
%<pastcnt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}yor%>l%{A%}r%>d%{I%} # ; 

LEXICON PRESENT-CONTINUOUS

%<pcont%>:%>%{I%}yor PERS1 ;
%<pcont%>:%>%{I%}yor KEN ;


!!! SPECIAL SETS !!!

LEXICON REGULAR-NEGATIVE 

CONDITIONAL ;
CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
FUTURE ;
FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
FUTURE-PERFECT ;
GERUND ;
IMPERATIVE ;
IMPERFECTIVE ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;
PAST ;
PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;

!!! ADVERBIAL FORMS AND COPULAS !!!

LEXICON KEN !!! ADVERBIAL FORM 

LEXICON COPULA

%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;                
!%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r # ;                                
%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}rl%{A%}r # ;    

%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}m # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}m # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%} # ;
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}k # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}l%{A%}r # ;  

%+i%<cop%>%<ken%>:%>%{y%}ken # ;    

LEXICON DEGIL

%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>değilim # ;     
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>değisin # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>değil # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>değiliz # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>değilsiniz # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>değiller # ;   

%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>değildim # ;     
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>değidin # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>değildi # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>değildik # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>değildiniz # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>değildiler # ;   

LEXICON DEGIL-QUESTION

%<cop%>%<neg%>:%>% değil QST ;

LEXICON COP

COPULA ;
DEGIL ;

%<ken%>:%>ken # ;


!!! PERSONE !!!

LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  # ;

LEXICON PERS1-NO3PL 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS1  !!!USED FOR CONT, FUT, AOR, EVID

%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%>l%{A%}r{D%}%{I%}r   CLIT ;
PERS1-NO3PL ;

LEXICON PERS2  !!!USED FOR PAST and CONDITIONAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS2-NO3PL 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z  # ;

LEXICON PERS3  !!!USED FOR NECESSITATIVE

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS3-PAST
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}m # ;                
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}m # ;                
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%} # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}k # ;                
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;                
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}l%{A%}r # ;  

LEXICON PERS4  !!!USED FOR IMPERATIVE
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>:%>y%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{A%}n%{A%}  # ;

LEXICON PERS5  !!!USED FOR negative aorist and abil
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}zs%{I%}n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}z CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}z{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}y%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}zs%{I%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}zl%{A%}r  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS6 !!! USED By Exhortative

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}y%{I%}m  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}l%{I%}m  CLIT ;


LEXICON Verbs

al:al V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "buy"
yap:yap V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "make, do"
aç:a%{ç%} V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "open"
et:e%{t%} V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "make"
kes:kes V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "cut"

gir:gir V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! enter"
git:gi%{t%} V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "go"
öl:öl V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "die"

de:d%{e%} V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "say"
oyna:oyna V-TV-T-IR ; ! "play"
